New Jersey, session 221, A4120.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    N.J.S.18A:74-12 is amended to read as follows: 18A:74-12.  The Department of the Treasury, at the request of the State Librarian, is hereby empowered to withhold any form of State Library aid from any municipality, county, or area library [which] that: a.  does not comply with the provisions of chapters 33 and 54 of Title 40 of the Revised Statutes and chapter 132 of the laws of 1947 (C.45:8A-1 et seq.) [wherever applicable, or]; b.  does not comply with any rules and regulations duly adopted pursuant to [said statutes] the provisions of chapters 33 and 54 of Title 40 of the Revised Statutes and chapter 132 of the laws of 1947 (C.45:8A-1 et seq.) or this chapter[, or which]; c.  bans or restricts access to a book or other resource within the municipality, county, or area librarys collection in violation of sections 2 and 3 of P.L.    , c. (C.       ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill); d.  fails to adopt the American Library Association's Library Bill of Rights or a policy prohibiting the practice of banning or restricting access to a specific book or resource as required pursuant to sections 2 and 3 of P.L.    , c.    (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill); or e.  reduces its annual expenditures for library services pursuant to chapters 33 and 54 of Title 40 of the Revised Statutes below the average of those expenditures for normal, recurring, operating costs made during the three years previous to receipt of the first State aid [under] pursuant to this chapter. (cf. P.L.2001, c.137, s.35) 2.  (New section)  a.  As used in this section: Free county public library means any free county library established pursuant to R.S.40:33-1. Free regional public library means any regional library established pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1962, c.134 (C.40:33-13.3). Governing body means a director or other chief administrative officer, a county library commission, and a board of county commissioners. b.  Notwithstanding any State or federal law to the contrary, a governing body of a free county or regional public library shall not ban or restrict access to a book or other resource in its collection because of partisan or doctrinal disapproval. c.  A governing body of a free county or regional public library shall adopt the American Library Association's Library Bill of Rights, or a policy prohibiting the practice of banning or restricting access to a book or resource because of partisan or doctrinal disapproval. d.  Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the governing body of a free county or regional public library to purchase, or otherwise acquire, a book or resource for inclusion in its collection. 3.  (New section)  a.  As used in this section: Free municipal public library means any free public library established pursuant to R.S.40:54-1. Joint free public library means any joint free public library established pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1959, c.155 (C.40:54-29.3). Governing body means a board of trustees and a director or other chief administrative officer. b.  Notwithstanding any State or federal law to the contrary, a governing body of a free municipal public library or joint free public library shall not ban or restrict access to a book or other resource in its collection because of partisan or doctrinal disapproval. c.  A governing body of a free municipal public library or joint free public library shall adopt the American Library Association's Library Bill of Rights, or a policy prohibiting the practice of banning or restricting access to a book or resource because of partisan or doctrinal disapproval. d.  Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the governing body of a municipal or joint free public library to purchase, or otherwise acquire, a book or resource for inclusion in its collection. 4.  (New section)  a.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a board of education of a school district shall not ban or restrict access to a book or other resource within a school librarys collection because of partisan or doctrinal disapproval. b.    A board of education of a school district shall adopt the American Library Association's Library Bill of Rights, or a policy prohibiting the practice of banning or restricting access to a book or resource because of partisan or doctrinal disapproval. c.     Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the board of education to purchase, or otherwise acquire, a book or resource for inclusion in its collection. d.    The Commissioner of Education is hereby authorized to withhold all or part of any State aid paid to any school district pursuant to P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-43 et al.) or any other law for failure to comply with the provisions of subsections a. and b. of this section. 5.  This act shall take effect immediately.